Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.037

Comprehensive budgeting, accounting, and reporting system conforming to generally accepted accounting principles—Budget document to conform.

(1) The director of financial management shall devise and maintain a comprehensive budgeting, accounting, and reporting system in conformance with generally accepted accounting principles applicable to state governments, as published in the accounting procedures manual pursuant to RCW 43.88.160(1).

(2) The director of financial management shall submit a budget document in conformance with generally accepted accounting principles applicable to state governments, as published in the accounting procedures manual pursuant to RCW 43.88.160(1).

[ 1987 c 502 s 3; 1984 c 247 s 1.]